Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.200

Liability of owners or others in possession of land and water areas for injuries to recreation users—Purpose.

The purpose of RCW 4.24.200 and 4.24.210 is to encourage owners or others in lawful possession and control of land and water areas or channels to make them available to the public for recreational purposes by limiting their liability toward persons entering thereon and toward persons who may be injured or otherwise damaged by the acts or omissions of persons entering thereon.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 24 s 1; 1967 c 216 s 1.]